Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.130

Regional noxious weed control board—Powers and duties.

The powers and duties of a regional noxious weed control board are as follows:

(1) The regional board shall, within ninety days of the adoption of the state noxious weed list from the state noxious weed control board and following a hearing, select those weeds from the state list that it finds necessary to be controlled on a regional basis. The weeds thus selected shall also be contained in the county noxious weed list of each county in the region.

(2) The regional board shall take action as may be necessary to coordinate the noxious weed control programs of the region and adopt a regional plan for the control of noxious weeds.

[ 1997 c 353 s 15; 1987 c 438 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 13.]